Hawaii statutes.
[§88D-4] Administration of a special pay
plan. (a) Each jurisdiction that establishes a special pay plan shall be
responsible for the administration of the plan.

(b) Each jurisdiction, individually or jointly
with other jurisdictions, may contract the services of a special pay plan
provider to administer the respective jurisdiction or jurisdictions' special
pay plan. Each jurisdiction may adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91, and
federal and state law, to effectuate the administration of the special pay
plan. [L 2003, c 109, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next